Washington statutes.
RCW 35.02.017

County auditor shall provide identification number.

Within one working day after the public meeting under RCW 35.02.015, the county auditor shall provide an identification number for the incorporation effort to the person who made the notice of proposing the incorporation. The identification number shall be included on the petition proposing the incorporation.

The petition proposing the incorporation may retain the proposed boundaries and other matters as described in the notice, or may alter the proposed boundaries and other matters.

[ 1994 c 216 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 216: See note following RCW 35.02.015.